Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 41 of Title 25, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The standard time in Oklahoma shall be known as Central
Standard Time.
B. This section shall not be construed to affect the standard
time established by United States law governing the movements of
common carriers engaged in interstate commerce or the time for
performance of an act by an officer or department of the United
States, as established by a statute, lawful order, rule or
regulation of the United States or an agency hereof.

Req. No. 14791 Page 1

C. As authorized by the Uniform Time Act of 1966, as amended,
and notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary by
the United States government relating to adoption of daylight saving
time by all of the states, the State of Oklahoma elects to reject
such time and elects to continue in force the terms of subsection A
of this section relating to standard time in Oklahoma.
D. The rejection of daylight saving time as provided for in
this section may be changed by future legislative action.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14791 MAH 01/07/26













Req. No. 14791 Page 2